dictionaries/ka_GE.aff
FLAG long
SFX Jo Y 11
SFX Jo 0       ოდი/&x1o         .
SFX Jo 0       ოდი/&x0o         .
SFX Jo 0       ოდა/&x0o         .
SFX Jo 0       ოდით/&x1o        .
SFX Jo 0       ოდით/&x0o        .
SFX Jo 0       ოდნენ/&x0o       .
SFX Jo 0       ოდე/&x1o         . # Subjunctive
SFX Jo 0       ოდე/&x0o         .
SFX Jo 0       ოდეს/&x0o         .
SFX Jo 0       ოდეთ/&x1o        .
SFX Jo 0       ოდეთ/&x0o        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JA Y 11
SFX JA 0       ოდი/&x1A         .
SFX JA 0       ოდი/&x0A         .
SFX JA 0       ოდა/&x0A         .
SFX JA 0       ოდით/&x1A        .
SFX JA 0       ოდით/&x0A        .
SFX JA 0       ოდნენ/&x0A       .
SFX JA 0       ოდე/&x1A         . # Subjunctive
SFX JA 0       ოდე/&x0A         .
SFX JA 0       ოდეს/&x0A         .
SFX JA 0       ოდეთ/&x1A        .
SFX JA 0       ოდეთ/&x0A        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JC Y 11
SFX JC 0       ოდი/&x1C         .
SFX JC 0       ოდი/&x0C         .
SFX JC 0       ოდა/&x0C         .
SFX JC 0       ოდით/&x1C        .
SFX JC 0       ოდით/&x0C        .
SFX JC 0       ოდნენ/&x0C       .
SFX JC 0       ოდე/&x1C         . # Subjunctive
SFX JC 0       ოდე/&x0C         .
SFX JC 0       ოდეს/&x0C         .
SFX JC 0       ოდეთ/&x1C        .
SFX JC 0       ოდეთ/&x0C        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Ja Y 11
SFX Ja 0       ოდი/&x1a         .
SFX Ja 0       ოდი/&x0a         .
SFX Ja 0       ოდა/&x0a         .
SFX Ja 0       ოდით/&x1a        .
SFX Ja 0       ოდით/&x0a        .
SFX Ja 0       ოდნენ/&x0a       .
SFX Ja 0       ოდე/&x1a         . # Subjunctive
SFX Ja 0       ოდე/&x0a         .
SFX Ja 0       ოდეს/&x0a         .
SFX Ja 0       ოდეთ/&x1a        .
SFX Ja 0       ოდეთ/&x0a        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Jc Y 11
SFX Jc 0       ოდი/&x1c         .
SFX Jc 0       ოდი/&x0c         .
SFX Jc 0       ოდა/&x0c         .
SFX Jc 0       ოდით/&x1c        .
SFX Jc 0       ოდით/&x0c        .
SFX Jc 0       ოდნენ/&x0c       .
SFX Jc 0       ოდე/&x1c         . # Subjunctive
SFX Jc 0       ოდე/&x0c         .
SFX Jc 0       ოდეს/&x0c         .
SFX Jc 0       ოდეთ/&x1c        .
SFX Jc 0       ოდეთ/&x0c        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JE Y 11
SFX JE 0       ოდი/&x1E         .
SFX JE 0       ოდი/&x0E         .
SFX JE 0       ოდა/&x0E         .
SFX JE 0       ოდით/&x1E        .
SFX JE 0       ოდით/&x0E        .
SFX JE 0       ოდნენ/&x0E       .
SFX JE 0       ოდე/&x1E         . # Subjunctive
SFX JE 0       ოდე/&x0E         .
SFX JE 0       ოდეს/&x0E         .
SFX JE 0       ოდეთ/&x1E        .
SFX JE 0       ოდეთ/&x0E        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JG Y 11
SFX JG 0       ოდი/&x1G         .
SFX JG 0       ოდი/&x0G         .
SFX JG 0       ოდა/&x0G         .
SFX JG 0       ოდით/&x1G        .
SFX JG 0       ოდით/&x0G        .
SFX JG 0       ოდნენ/&x0G       .
SFX JG 0       ოდე/&x1G         . # Subjunctive
SFX JG 0       ოდე/&x0G         .
SFX JG 0       ოდეს/&x0G         .
SFX JG 0       ოდეთ/&x1G        .
SFX JG 0       ოდეთ/&x0G        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Je Y 11
SFX Je 0       ოდი/&x1e         .
SFX Je 0       ოდი/&x0e         .
SFX Je 0       ოდა/&x0e         .
SFX Je 0       ოდით/&x1e        .
SFX Je 0       ოდით/&x0e        .
SFX Je 0       ოდნენ/&x0e       .
SFX Je 0       ოდე/&x1e         . # Subjunctive
SFX Je 0       ოდე/&x0e         .
SFX Je 0       ოდეს/&x0e         .
SFX Je 0       ოდეთ/&x1e        .
SFX Je 0       ოდეთ/&x0e        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Jg Y 11
SFX Jg 0       ოდი/&x1g         .
SFX Jg 0       ოდი/&x0g         .
SFX Jg 0       ოდა/&x0g         .
SFX Jg 0       ოდით/&x1g        .
SFX Jg 0       ოდით/&x0g        .
SFX Jg 0       ოდნენ/&x0g       .
SFX Jg 0       ოდე/&x1g         . # Subjunctive
SFX Jg 0       ოდე/&x0g         .
SFX Jg 0       ოდეს/&x0g         .
SFX Jg 0       ოდეთ/&x1g        .
SFX Jg 0       ოდეთ/&x0g        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JX Y 11
SFX JX 0       ოდი/&x1X         .
SFX JX 0       ოდი/&x0X         .
SFX JX 0       ოდა/&x0X         .
SFX JX 0       ოდით/&x1X        .
SFX JX 0       ოდით/&x0X        .
SFX JX 0       ოდნენ/&x0X       .
SFX JX 0       ოდე/&x1X         . # Subjunctive
SFX JX 0       ოდე/&x0X         .
SFX JX 0       ოდეს/&x0X         .
SFX JX 0       ოდეთ/&x1X        .
SFX JX 0       ოდეთ/&x0X        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Jx Y 11
SFX Jx 0       ოდი/&x1x         .
SFX Jx 0       ოდი/&x0x         .
SFX Jx 0       ოდა/&x0x         .
SFX Jx 0       ოდით/&x1x        .
SFX Jx 0       ოდით/&x0x        .
SFX Jx 0       ოდნენ/&x0x       .
SFX Jx 0       ოდე/&x1x         . # Subjunctive
SFX Jx 0       ოდე/&x0x         .
SFX Jx 0       ოდეს/&x0x         .
SFX Jx 0       ოდეთ/&x1x        .
SFX Jx 0       ოდეთ/&x0x        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JW Y 11
SFX JW 0       ოდი/&x1W         .
SFX JW 0       ოდი/&x0W         .
SFX JW 0       ოდა/&x0W         .
SFX JW 0       ოდით/&x1W        .
SFX JW 0       ოდით/&x0W        .
SFX JW 0       ოდნენ/&x0W       .
SFX JW 0       ოდე/&x1W         . # Subjunctive
SFX JW 0       ოდე/&x0W         .
SFX JW 0       ოდეს/&x0W         .
SFX JW 0       ოდეთ/&x1W        .
SFX JW 0       ოდეთ/&x0W        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Jw Y 11
SFX Jw 0       ოდი/&x1w         .
SFX Jw 0       ოდი/&x0w         .
SFX Jw 0       ოდა/&x0w         .
SFX Jw 0       ოდით/&x1w        .
SFX Jw 0       ოდით/&x0w        .
SFX Jw 0       ოდნენ/&x0w       .
SFX Jw 0       ოდე/&x1w         . # Subjunctive
SFX Jw 0       ოდე/&x0w         .
SFX Jw 0       ოდეს/&x0w         .
SFX Jw 0       ოდეთ/&x1w        .
SFX Jw 0       ოდეთ/&x0w        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Jn Y 11
SFX Jn 0       ოდი/&x1n         .
SFX Jn 0       ოდი/&x0n         .
SFX Jn 0       ოდა/&x0n         .
SFX Jn 0       ოდით/&x1n        .
SFX Jn 0       ოდით/&x0n        .
SFX Jn 0       ოდნენ/&x0n       .
SFX Jn 0       ოდე/&x1n         . # Subjunctive
SFX Jn 0       ოდე/&x0n         .
SFX Jn 0       ოდეს/&x0n         .
SFX Jn 0       ოდეთ/&x1n        .
SFX Jn 0       ოდეთ/&x0n        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX JN Y 11
SFX JN 0       ოდი/&x1N         .
SFX JN 0       ოდი/&x0N         .
SFX JN 0       ოდა/&x0N         .
SFX JN 0       ოდით/&x1N        .
SFX JN 0       ოდით/&x0N        .
SFX JN 0       ოდნენ/&x0N       .
SFX JN 0       ოდე/&x1N         . # Subjunctive
SFX JN 0       ოდე/&x0N         .
SFX JN 0       ოდეს/&x0N         .
SFX JN 0       ოდეთ/&x1N        .
SFX JN 0       ოდეთ/&x0N        .
# ოდნენ
  


##########
# Aorist #
##########



SFX AI Y 4
SFX AI 0       ე/&x1I         .
SFX AI 0       ე/&x0I         .
SFX AI 0       ეთ/&x1I        .
SFX AI 0       ეთ/&x0I        .

SFX BI Y 4
SFX BI 0       ი/&x1I         .
SFX BI 0       ი/&x0I         .
SFX BI 0       ით/&x1I        .
SFX BI 0       ით/&x0I        .

SFX aI Y 1
SFX aI 0 ა/&x0I       .

SFX bI Y 1
SFX bI 0 ო/&x0I       .

SFX kI Y 1
SFX kI 0 ეს/&x0I       .

SFX lI Y 1
SFX lI 0 ნენ/&x0I       .
  
SFX Ao Y 4
SFX Ao 0       ე/&x1o         .
SFX Ao 0       ე/&x0o         .
SFX Ao 0       ეთ/&x1o        .
SFX Ao 0       ეთ/&x0o        .

SFX Bo Y 4
SFX Bo 0       ი/&x1o         .
SFX Bo 0       ი/&x0o         .
SFX Bo 0       ით/&x1o        .
SFX Bo 0       ით/&x0o        .

SFX ao Y 1
SFX ao 0 ა/&x0o       .

SFX bo Y 1
SFX bo 0 ო/&x0o       .

SFX ko Y 1
SFX ko 0 ეს/&x0o       .

SFX lo Y 1
SFX lo 0 ნენ/&x0o       .
  
SFX AA Y 4
SFX AA 0       ე/&x1A         .
SFX AA 0       ე/&x0A         .
SFX AA 0       ეთ/&x1A        .
SFX AA 0       ეთ/&x0A        .

SFX BA Y 4
SFX BA 0       ი/&x1A         .
SFX BA 0       ი/&x0A         .
SFX BA 0       ით/&x1A        .
SFX BA 0       ით/&x0A        .

SFX aA Y 1
SFX aA 0 ა/&x0A       .

SFX bA Y 1
SFX bA 0 ო/&x0A       .

SFX kA Y 1
SFX kA 0 ეს/&x0A       .

SFX lA Y 1
SFX lA 0 ნენ/&x0A       .
  
SFX AC Y 4
SFX AC 0       ე/&x1C         .
SFX AC 0       ე/&x0C         .
SFX AC 0       ეთ/&x1C        .
SFX AC 0       ეთ/&x0C        .

SFX BC Y 4
SFX BC 0       ი/&x1C         .
SFX BC 0       ი/&x0C         .
SFX BC 0       ით/&x1C        .
SFX BC 0       ით/&x0C        .

SFX aC Y 1
SFX aC 0 ა/&x0C       .

SFX bC Y 1
SFX bC 0 ო/&x0C       .

SFX kC Y 1
SFX kC 0 ეს/&x0C       .

SFX lC Y 1
SFX lC 0 ნენ/&x0C       .
  
