dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
აბ/TITETGTXBoaokoBEaEkEBGaGkG&v
აბარ/OIOCAIaIkIACaCkC&v
აბრუნ/OoOeOXOnAIaIkIAnankn&v
აგ/OIOAOWONAAaAkAAWaWkWANaNkN
აგდ/OCOEOGOXAIbIkIACaCkCAcbckcAEaEkEAGaGkGAXaXkXAnbnkn&v
აგვარ/OoAoaoko&v
ავლინ/OoOgAIaIkIAoaoko&v
ათავ/OGAoaokoAGaGkG&v
ათავს/OoOEAoaoko&v
ათვალიერ/ACaCkC&v
აკარ/AIaIkI&v
აკვლევინ/Aoaoko&v
აკითხ/OIAIaIkI&v
ანთ/AAbAkA
ანიჭ/OIAIaIkI&v
ართვ/TITcTWBIaIkIBcackcBgagkgBWaWkW
არტყ/TnBoaokoBnankn&v
ასრულ/OEOnAAaAkAAEaEkEAnankn&v
ატარ/OCOGONACaCkCAGaGkG&v
ატოვ/OIAIaIkI&v
აქრ/OCACaCkC&v
აქცი/OIOoOXONAIaIkIAXaXkXAWaWkWANaNkN&v
აღწი/OIOEOnAIaIkIAoaokoAnankn&v
აყენ/OIOnAIaIkIAnankn&v
აყვანინ/Aoaoko&v
აშორ/Aoboko&v
აცვ/BCaCkCBNaNkN
აცილ/Aoboko&v
აწვდინ/OIAIaIkI&v
აწყვ/AoaokoAnankn&v
ახდინ/OoAoaoko&v
ახერხ/OoAoaoko&v
ბაძ/OIAIaIkI&v
ბმ/JE
დ/OCOGOXOnTnonACaCkCAEbEkE&v
დრიან/BAaAkA&v
ებრძ/JN&v
ეგ/Aobolo
ედ/BAaAkA
ეკუთვნ/JN&v
ელ/JoJN
ემხრ/OIAIaIlI&v
ერე/NSNNJN
ერიდებ/JN&v
ესალმ/OIAIaIlIAgaglg&v
ეტყ/JN&v
ეუბნებ/JN&v
ეშვ/TXBoaoloBCaClCBEaElEBnanln&v
ეც/oNBIaIkIBGaGkGBXaXkXBnanln
ეძლე/JN&v
ეწე/Jn&v
ეწყვ/Aoaolo&v
თვალ/OCOnACaCkCAcackcAnankn
იარ/OoOGOXONAoaokoAAaAkAAcackcAGaGkGAeaekeAgagkgAXaXkXANaNkN
იბარ/ACbCkCAnankn&v
იბრძ/JN&v
იგ/OoOGAoaokoAGaGkG
იგდ/OCACaCkC&v
იგონ/OoOGAoaokoAGaGkGAgagkg&v
იდ/OCOnTATNACaCkCAnankn
იდინ/OCACaCkC&v
ითმინ/OoOnAoaoko&v
იკითხ/OaOXOWONAoaokoAaaakaAWaWkWANaNkN
იკრიბ/OEAoboko&v
იმალ/OnAIaIlIAnanln&v
იმკ/OoBoaoko&v
ინადირ/Aoboko&v
ინდომ/OoAoaoko&v
ირბინ/AAaAkAAXaXkX&v
ირთვ/TIBIaIkI&v
ირჩი/OAAAaAkA&v
ისვენ/OoOEOnAoaokoAnankn&v
ისმინ/OoONoNAoaoko&v
ისრ/JN
ისროლ/ONAobokoAXaXkX&v
ისურვ/ONAoaokoANaNkN&v
იტაც/OoOGAoaoko&v
იტყ/JNOEAEaEkE&v
იფიქრ/OoONAoaokoAGbGkGANaNkN&v
იქნებ/JN
იქცე/JoJN
იღ/OIOoOAOaOGOeOgOWOwONAIaIkIAoaokoAAaAkAAaaakaAGaGkGAeaekeAgagkgAXbXkXAxbxkxAWaWkWAwawkwAnbnkn&v
იყარ/OEAoaoko&v
იშალ/onAobokoAEaElE&v
იშორ/OoAoaoko&v
იჩნი/OIAIaIkI&v
იც/JN
იცალ/Aoaoko&v
იცვ/ToTCTnBCaCkCBXaXkX&v
იცინ/JNOGONAGaGkGANaNkN
იძულ/Aoboko&v
იწვ/JNTnANaNlN&v
იწვი/PNOoOgAoaokoAGaGkGAgagkg
კვდებ/Jo&v
კრიფ/OAAoaoko&v
მართ/OIOGONAIaIkIAGaGkG
მღერ/JNPN
ნახ/OoOgONAoaokoAgagkgANaNkN
რბი/JNPN
რეკ/OnAoaokoAnankn
რთ/OCAoaokoACaCkCAgbgkgAnankn
სვ/TCTnTNBoaokoBCaCkCBEaEkEBnankn
სტირ/JN
ტეხ/OAOGAAaAkAAGaGkG&v
უარ/OoOCOeAoaokoACaCkCAGaGkGAeaeke
უგ/OIOoOGAIaIkI&v
უგდ/AIbIkIAnbnkn&v
უდ/OnACbCkC
უთით/OIAIaIkI&v
უკრძალ/AAaAkA&v
უმადლ/JN&v
უმატ/OIOnAIaIkIAnankn&v
უსვ/TGTnBoaokoBnankn&v
უტევ/OIAIaIkI&v
უღ/OoOWAoaokoAGbGkGAWaWkW
უშვ/TCTaTGTnBIaIkIBCaCkCBEaEkEBGaGkGBgagkgBnankn&v
უწ/JGJN&v
ღნიშნ/OAAAaAkA&v
ყლაპ/OXACaCkC&v
შველ/JN&v
ძვრ/oEoGACaClC&v
ხდებ/JG
ხმარებ/Jn&v
ხსენ/BAaAkA&v
ხსნ/ToTATaTGBAaAkABaaaka&v
ხტ/BCaCkCBcaclcBwawkw&v
ჰკვდ/Aoaoko&v
ჰმართ/OIAIaIkI&v
